Hawaii statutes.
§264-73 Regulations. The director of
transportation may promulgate rules and regulations governing the erection and
maintenance of outdoor advertising permitted under section 264-72, consistent
with the safety and welfare of the traveling public and with the national
standards promulgated by the Secretary of Transportation pursuant to Title 23,
United States Code. [L 1966, c 45, pt of §2; HRS §264-73]

Cross References

Rulemaking, see chapter 91.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next